Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB156.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 56.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Secretary of State shall have custody of all records, judgments, deeds, maps
and abstracts of title of land or buildings owned for governmental purposes by the
state except deeds to rights-of-way for state or federal roads. In this section, "roads"
does not include state-owned bridges or their approaches.
(2) The Secretary of State shall record all the deeds in a separate book and shall file,
keep and have accessible the originals of all papers mentioned in subsection (1) of
this section, and the books in which they are recorded. He or she shall index and
cross-index the original papers and record books, including an index according to
the county where the property is located and according to the use or department of
the state government using the property. The records and indexes shall not be
moved from the Office of the Secretary of State.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/12/2025 3:16 PM Jacketed